Utah statutes.
53A-25a-105.   Braille versions of textbooks.
(1)  As a condition of the annual contract for instructional materials process
and as a condition of textbook acceptance, the State Board of Education shall
require publishers of textbooks recommended by the board to furnish, on
request, their textbooks and related instructional materials in an electronic
file set, in conformance with the National Instructional Materials
Accessibility Standard, from which Braille versions of all or part of the
textbook and related instructional materials can be produced.
(2)  When Braille translation software for specialty code translation becomes
available, publishers shall furnish, on request, electronic file sets, in
conformance with the National Instructional Materials Accessibility Standard,
for nonliterary subjects such as mathematics and science.
